Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 19.150.120 and 1988 c 240 s 13 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Each contract for the rental or lease of individual storage space in a self-service storage facility shall be in writing and shall contain, in addition to the provisions otherwise required or permitted by law to be included, a statement requiring the occupant to disclose any lienholders or secured parties who have an interest in the property that is or will be stored in the self-service storage facility, a statement that the occupant's property will be subject to a claim of lien and may even be sold to satisfy the lien if the rent or other charges due remain unpaid for ((fourteen))14 consecutive days, and that such actions are authorized by this chapter.(2) The lien authorized by this chapter shall not attach, unless the rental agreement requests, and provides space for, the occupant to give the name and address of another person to whom the preliminary lien notice and subsequent notices required to be given under this chapter may be sent. Notices sent pursuant to RCW 19.150.040 or 19.150.060 shall be sent to the occupant's address and the alternative address, if both addresses are provided by the occupant. Failure of an occupant to provide an alternative address shall not affect an owner's remedies under this chapter or under any other provision of law.(3) A rental agreement may be delivered and executed electronically.(4) If the occupant has provided an email address to the owner, the owner must send the rental agreement to the occupant by email and first-class mail.(5) If the occupant does not sign a rental agreement that the owner has delivered to the occupant by hand delivery, first-class mail, or email, the occupant's continued use of the storage space for not less than 30 days from the date of the notice constitutes an acceptance of the rental agreement with the same effect as if it had been signed by the occupant.(6)(a) The rental agreement may contain a provision notifying the occupant of the owner's right to dispose of personal property remaining at the self-service storage facility more than five days after the termination or nonrenewal of the rental agreement.(b) An occupant may not use a self-service storage facility after the owner has delivered a written notice by hand delivery, verified mail, or email of the termination or nonrenewal of the occupant's rental agreement. Such a notice must provide the occupant with not less than 25 days after delivery of the notice to remove all personal property from the self-service storage facility.(c) Prior to the occupant's removal of all personal property, the owner may place reasonable restrictions on the occupant's use of the self-service storage facility, including denying access to the self-service storage facility except for the occupant to remove personal property during the owner's office hours. The owner may dispose of any personal property remaining at the self-service storage facility after the date provided in the written notice pursuant to (b) of this subsection.--- END ---